Maryland, session 2026, HB0382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. MARYLAND BROADBAND OPPORTUNITY AND FAIRNESS.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 382 3
(B) (1) “BROADBAND SERVICE” MEANS A MASS–MARKET RETAIL SERVICE
THAT PROVIDES THE CAPABILITY TO TRANSMIT DATA TO AND RECEIVE DATA FROM
ALL OR SUBSTANTIALLY ALL INTERNET ENDPOINTS, INCLUDING ANY CAPABILITIES
THAT ARE INCIDENTAL TO AND ENABLE THE OPERATION OF COMMUNICATIONS
SERVICES PROVIDED BY A WIRELINE, FIXED WIRELESS, MOBILE WIRELESS
BROADBAND, OR SATELLITE SERVICE PROVIDER.
(2) “BROADBAND SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE DIAL–UP SERVICE.
(C) “LOW–INCOME CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE HOUSEHOLD
OR AT LEAST ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD:
(1) MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR:
(I) FREE AND REDUCED PRICE MEAL PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED
BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(II) SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
BENEFITS; OR
(III) MEDICAID BENEFITS;
(2) IN THE PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR, MET THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA
FOR:
(I) THE MARYLAND EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT; OR
(II) THE CREDIT FOR THE ELDERLY AND THE PERMANENTLY
AND TOTALLY DISABLED UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 22;
(3) RECEIVES A BENEFIT THROUGH A LOW–INCOME ENERGY
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; OR
(4) HAS AN ANNUAL HOUSEHOLD INCOME AT OR BELOW 350% OF THE
FEDERAL POVERTY GUIDELINES.
(D) (C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF STATEWIDE BROADBAND IN
THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM.
(F) (D) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT PROVIDES BROADBAND
SERVICE TO 10,000 OR MORE CUSTOMERS.

HOUSE BILL 382
14–5102.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, EACH PROVIDER IN THE STATE
SHALL ESTABLISH A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PROGRAM SHALL OFFER AT LEAST ONE LOW–COST BROADBAND
SERVICE OPTION TO ELIGIBLE LOW–INCOME CONSUMERS INCLUDING:
1. A MINIMUM BROADBAND SPEED OF:
A. 100 MEGABITS PER SECOND DOWNLOAD SPEED AND
20 MEGABITS PER SECOND UPLOAD SPEED FOR A HOUSEHOLD OF TWO OR LESS; OR
B. 200 MEGABITS PER SECOND DOWNLOAD SPEED AND
20 MEGABITS PER SECOND UPLOAD SPEED FOR A HOUSEHOLD OF THREE OR MORE;
2. AT LEAST 1.2 TERABYTES OF DATA STORAGE; AND
3. A LATENCY THAT IS SUFFICIENTLY LOW TO ALLOW
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE, REAL–TIME, INTERACTIVE APPLICATIONS.
(II) NETWORK OUTAGES OF BROADBAND SERVICES OFFERED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED, ON AVERAGE, 48
HOURS WITHIN ANY YEAR.
(2) THE OFFICE MAY MODIFY THE DOWNLOAD AND UPLOAD SPEEDS
REQUIRED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR AREAS OF THE STATE
IN WHICH SUCH SPEEDS ARE NOT REASONABLY PRACTICABLE.
(3) (I) A PROVIDER MAY, ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS, INCREASE THE
PRICE OF BROADBAND SERVICE PROVIDED UNDER THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM BY
THE LESSER OF:
1. THE MOST RECENT CHANGE IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS; OR
2. NOT MORE THAN 2% PER YEAR.
(II) A PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST 30 DAYS’ NOTICE OF
A PRICE INCREASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO CONSUMERS

HOUSE BILL 382 5
CURRENTLY ENROLLED IN THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM AND THE OFFICE BEFORE
INCREASING THE PRICE.
(C) A PROVIDER MAY NOT REQUIRE ENROLLMENT IN AN AUTOMATIC
PAYMENT PLAN AS A CRITERION FOR ELIGIBILITY IN A PROGRAM.
(D) A PROVIDER SHALL ALLOW CUSTOMERS ENROLLED IN THE PROVIDER’S
PROGRAM TO PURCHASE STAND–ALONE BROADBAND SERVICE, OR BROADBAND
SERVICE BUNDLED WITH CABLE TELEVISION OR PHONE SERVICE.
(E) ANY CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT FOR BROADBAND SERVICE OFFERED AS
PART OF A PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS, OTHER
THAN PRICE AND BROADBAND SPEED, AS REGULARLY PRICED PLANS FOR SIMILAR
SERVICES OFFERED BY THE PROVIDER.
(F) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC IN A
PROMINENT MANNER ON ITS WEBSITE ANYWHERE THAT A LIST OF AVAILABLE PLANS
IS POSTED THE AVAILABILITY OF BROADBAND SERVICE FOR LOW–INCOME
CONSUMERS AND ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES.
(2) A PROVIDER SHALL MAKE ALL COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO PROMOTE AND ADVERTISE THE AVAILABILITY OF BROADBAND SERVICE
FOR LOW–INCOME CONSUMERS AND ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES ON THE
PROVIDER’S WEBSITE AND IN ANY WRITTEN OR COMMERCIAL PROMOTIONAL OR
ADVERTISING MATERIALS.
(3) ANY PROMOTION OR ADVERTISING REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE PROMINENT DISPLAY OF
THE PROVIDER’S PROGRAM.
(G) FOR ANY PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES A LOW–COST BROADBAND SERVICE
TO A CUSTOMER UNDER THIS SECTION THAT INVOLVES LAYING FIBER–OPTIC
CABLES OR CONDUIT UNDERGROUND OR ALONG A ROADWAY, THE PROVIDER SHALL
INCLUDE INTERSPERSED CONDUIT ACCESS POINTS AT REGULAR AND SHORT
INTERVALS.
(H) IF A PROVIDER CAN NO LONGER PROVIDE A LOW–COST BROADBAND
SERVICE OPTION TO A CUSTOMER UNDER THIS SECTION, THE PROVIDER SHALL SELL
THE NETWORK CAPACITY AT A REASONABLE, WHOLESALE RATE ON A
NONDISCRIMINATORY BASIS TO OTHER PROVIDERS.
14–5103.

HOUSE BILL 382
THE OFFICE MAY EXEMPT A PROVIDER FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF §
14–5102 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF:
(1) THE PROVIDER PROVIDES BROADBAND SERVICE TO FEWER THAN
20,000 HOUSEHOLDS; AND
(2) THE OFFICE DETERMINES THAT COMPLIANCE WOULD RESULT IN
AN UNREASONABLE OR UNSUSTAINABLE FINANCIAL IMPACT ON THE PROVIDER.
14–5104. 14–5102.
(A) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 15, 2027, AND EACH NOVEMBER 15
THEREAFTER, A PROVIDER IN THE STATE SHALL FILE WITH THE OFFICE A
COMPLIANCE REPORT INCLUDING:
(1) THE AVAILABILITY OF A LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PROGRAM;
(2) THE NUMBER OF CONSUMERS ENROLLED IN THE PROGRAM;
(3) THE ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR CONSUMERS TO QUALIFY FOR
THE PROGRAM;
(3) (4) THE PROCEDURES USED TO VERIFY THE ELIGIBILITY OF
CUSTOMERS APPLYING FOR THE PROGRAM;
(4) (5) THE ADVERTISING AND MARKETING EFFORTS
UNDERTAKEN TO ADVERTISE AND PROMOTE THE AVAILABILITY OF THE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING SAMPLES OF ADVERTISING AND MARKETING MATERIALS;
(5) (6) ALL BROADBAND SERVICE PLANS OFFERED BY THE
PROVIDER, INCLUDING PRICING AND BROADBAND SPEEDS; AND
(6) (7) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE OFFICE CONSIDERS
NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2029, AND AT LEAST EVERY 5 YEARS 2027,
AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE WHETHER THE MINIMUM BROADBAND DOWNLOAD
AND UPLOAD SPEEDS AND DATA STORAGE REQUIRED IN § 14–5102(B)(1) OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHOULD BE INCREASED TO:

HOUSE BILL 382 7
(I) THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION’S
BENCHMARK FOR HIGH–SPEED FIXED BROADBAND DOWNLOAD AND UPLOAD
SPEEDS; OR
(II) COMMONLY AVAILABLE MOBILE BROADBAND DOWNLOAD
AND UPLOAD SPEEDS, AND DATA STORAGE LIMITS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) (I) EVALUATE THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR A
LOW–INCOME CONSUMER; AND
(1) DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROGRAMS REPORTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ARE SUFFICIENT TO MEET THE NEEDS OF
LOW–INCOME CONSUMERS IN THE STATE; AND
(II) (2) INCLUDE IN THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER § 6.5–104
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE THE INFORMATION
REPORTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR CHANGES TO THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS. RELATED TO LOW–INCOME
CONSUMER PROGRAMS IN THE STATE.
14–5105.
(A) (1) THERE IS A BROADBAND AFFORDABILITY ADVISORY BOARD.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE ADVISORY BOARD IS, SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, TO ESTABLISH A DEFINITION FOR A LOW–COST
BROADBAND SERVICE OPTION AS REQUIRED BY 47 U.S.C. § 1702.
(B) THE ADVISORY BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(3) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(4) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE, APPOINTED
BY THE GOVERNOR;

HOUSE BILL 382
(5) ONE ATTORNEY FROM THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
WITH EXPERIENCE IN CONSUMER PROTECTION, APPOINTED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL;
(6) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH PROVIDER IN THE STATE; AND
(7) REPRESENTATIVES FROM ANY STAKEHOLDER GROUPS
APPROVED BY THE MEMBERS FROM THE EXECUTIVE AND LEGISLATIVE BRANCHES
OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(C) THE ADVISORY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT THE DEFINITION OF LOW–COST
BROADBAND SERVICE OPTION TO THE OFFICE FOR SUBMITTAL TO THE NATIONAL
TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION FOR APPROVAL
UNDER 47 U.S.C. § 1702.
(D) THE DEFINITION OF LOW–COST BROADBAND SERVICE OPTION SHALL:
(1) MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MEET ANY REQUIREMENTS SET BY FEDERAL LAW; AND
(3) MEET ANY REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE NATIONAL
TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION.
14–5106.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE AND IS
SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE
13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Housing and Community Development
6.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Statewide Broadband.
(c) “Office” means the Office of Statewide Broadband.
6.5–104.
(a) The Office shall:

HOUSE BILL 382 9
(1) develop definitions and standards for broadband Internet that:
(i) address current and future requirements and uses by
communities, businesses, schools, health care providers, and other stakeholders;
(ii) reflect the need for a forward–looking, statewide digital
communications infrastructure; [and]
(iii) ARE CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(IV) are not at odds with definitions and standards adopted by the
Federal Communications Commission;
(2) (i) collect promotional and nonpromotional pricing data directly
from broadband Internet providers, INCLUDING DATA REQUIRED UNDER § 14–5104(A)
§ 14–5102(A) OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; and
(ii) assess the actual upload and download speeds experienced by
consumers;
(4) create a website that houses a publicly accessible map that allows users
to overlay GIS heat mapping comments, based on and incorporating data and information
from the Federal Communications Commission, that shows, in addition to any information
provided by the Federal Communications Commission:
(i) which residences do and do not have access to broadband
Internet;
(ii) broadband Internet service prices and plans available in
different areas, INCLUDING REDUCED RATE BROADBAND PLANS FOR LOW–INCOME
CONSUMERS; and
(iii) other available State geographic and demographic data;
(5) collect, analyze, and publicly share:
(i) geographic and demographic data regarding households that rely
on mobile broadband for Internet service, based on the understanding that mobile
broadband is not a substitute for in–home fixed Internet services;
(ii) data regarding the adoption and affordability of reliable
broadband Internet in the State, including the average cost per average speed by county;
[and]

HOUSE BILL 382
(iii) data regarding investments in expanding Internet
infrastructure, adoption, and speed increases; AND
(IV) AVAILABLE BROADBAND PRODUCTS INCLUDING RETAIL
RATE PLANS AND LOW–INCOME CONSUMER PLANS;
(e) (1) On or before December 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the Office
shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly on:
(i) the progress of the State’s efforts to:
1. develop and implement the plan required under
subsection (c) of this section;
2. increase access and connection to broadband Internet
services throughout the State with specific reporting on improvements to infrastructure,
adoption, and speeds;
3. improve digital literacy among residents of the State; and
4. increase speeds to meet or exceed the Federal
Communications Commission standard for upload and download speeds;
(ii) the existing gaps in connectivity and the State’s progress toward
closing those gaps;
(iii) the impact that gaps in Internet service have on the workforce
and State and local economies;
(iv) information from local education agencies on the impact of
Internet service quality on student achievement and access to 21st century opportunities;
(v) demographic data on locations with gaps in services; and
(vi) the allocation of money from, and programs supported by, the
Digital Inclusion Fund, the Digital Connectivity Fund, and the Rural Broadband
Assistance Fund in the preceding fiscal year.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(I) MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 14–5104(B)(2)(II) §
14–5102(B)(2) OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(II) be published on the website established under subsection (a)(4)
of this section.

HOUSE BILL 382 11
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.